New Jersey, session 221, S2004.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  No four-year public institution of higher education shall charge tuition or fees to the spouse or dependent child of a disabled veteran provided that: (1)   the spouse or child has been accepted to pursue a course of undergraduate study and is enrolled as an undergraduate student in good standing at that institution; (2)   the spouse or child has applied for all available State student grants and scholarships and all available federal student grants and scholarships for which the spouse or child is eligible; and (3)   the spouse or child has applied for tuition benefits available through the United States Department of Veterans Affairs for which the spouse or child is eligible under the "Post-9/11 Veterans Educational Assistance Act of 2008," Pub.L.110-252 (38 U.S.C. s.3301 et seq.). b.    The State shall reimburse each institution of higher education for the costs of waiving tuition and fees pursuant to the provisions of this act. c.     As used in this act: disabled veteran means a person who has served on active duty in the Armed Forces of the United States and who was discharged or released therefrom under conditions other than dishonorable, and who has experienced a total and permanent disability as certified by the United States Department of Veterans Affairs as a consequence of military service. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.